Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Special Management Program

§ 11-5-301.
Authorization
of program.

A weed and pest special
management program may be carried out as provided by this article
and legislative appropriation acts. All state and local governmental
entities shall comply with the program.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 113, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “Effective July 1, 1990” at the beginning.

§ 11-5-302.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“District” means any county weed and pest control district;

“Integrated management system” means the planning and implementation of a coordinated program utilizing all proven methods for containing and controlling undesirable plants and pests, including but not limited to education, preventive measures, physical methods, biological agents, pesticide methods, cultural methods and management;

“Management zone” means a geographical area within a district;

“Materials” means materials used in carrying out the objectives of integrated management system;

“Method” means a procedure or process for carrying out the application method prescribed;

“Pest” means any declared pest or designated pest defined by W.S. 11-5-102(a);

“Treatment program” means the use of an integrated management system prescribed by the district board or the board’s designated representative;

“Undesirable plant” means any declared weed or designated noxious weed as defined by W.S. 11-5-102(a).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 113, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-5-303.
Program components; funding; rulemaking authority; penalties.

Any district may carry out a weed and pest special management program in accordance with this article. If a district initiates a program, leafy spurge (Euphorbia esula) shall receive priority in the program. A district may also implement an integrated management system under W.S.

11-5-101

through

11-5-119

using funds specified by W.S.

11-5-111

, provided leafy spurge shall receive priority pursuant to this article.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 2, § 3.

Any district which implements a special management program under this article shall:

Establish one (1) or more management zones within the district. A management zone can only be formed with the written consent of a majority of the landowners in the proposed management zone;

Complete an inventory on lands within each management zone to determine the scope of infestation;

Establish management criteria for the special management program;

Select the materials and methods for the special management program based upon best available scientific facts, current technology and economic considerations;

At least ten (10) days before final approval of the program by the district board, give notice to the public in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation within the county describing the special management program and approximating the cost of the program. Notice shall also be given through another medium if the board determines additional publication is necessary to ensure sufficient notice to the public.

Programs under this article shall be funded as follows:

Landowners shall contribute to the cost of the treatment program on their land as determined by the district board not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total cost;

The district shall contribute to the cost of the treatment program within the limitation of district funds available under subsection (e) of this section;

State or federal agencies owning lands or administering lands, which are untaxed for the purposes of this act, shall contribute to the total cost of the special management program;

Assistance to a district’s coordinated program may be provided by legislative appropriation pursuant to W.S. 11-5-113(b).

A district may levy not to exceed an additional one (1) mill on the assessed value of the taxable property within the district to fund its contributions under this section. Upon request by the district board, the board of county commissioners may levy the amount of tax requested not to exceed the mill levy authorized by W.S.

11-5-111

and this subsection.

Any landowner who refuses to perform remedial requirements as established by the district board after due notice as required by W.S.

11-5-109

may be subject to a fine provided by W.S.

11-5-109

.

The Wyoming weed and pest council, with the approval of the majority of the board, may:

Adopt rules and regulations as provided by W.S.

11-5-119

to implement an effective special management program in Wyoming; and

Establish procedures for prompt reporting and billing of expenditures made and for timely forecasting of future expenditures which will be required.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 113, § 1; 2021 ch. 2, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendments —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in (c)(v), substituted "board" for "supervisors" following "the district", "give" for "publish" preceding notice, added "to the public" preceding "in at least," substituted "approximating the" for "listing the participating landowners and stating the approximate" preceding "cost of," and added the second sentence; in (d)(iii), added "to" following "contribute", substituted "special management" for "treatment," and deleted "on those lands" at the end; and rewrote (g), which read, "The state board of agriculture may."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 2, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed former (b), which read, "Pursuant to this article a district may implement an integrated management system on two (2) undesirable plants or on two (2) pests or a combination of one (1) undesirable plant and one (1) pest but under no circumstance shall the program exceed a total of two (2)."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.